Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2054HH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 164 Section 1. Section 1.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 1.2 Sovereignty. 3 The state possesses sovereignty coextensive with the 4 boundaries referred to in section 1.1 , subject to such rights 5 as may at any time exist in the United States in relation to 6 public lands, or to any military or naval establishment of the 7 national government . 8